New York, session 2025-2026, S5774.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3126 of the civil practice law and rules, as 2 amended by chapter 98 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 3126. Penalties for refusal to comply with order or to disclose. 5 (a) If any party, or a person who at the time a deposition is taken or 6 an examination or inspection is made is an officer, director, member, 7 employee or agent of a party or otherwise under a party's control, 8 refuses to obey an order for disclosure or wilfully fails to disclose 9 information which the court finds ought to have been disclosed pursuant 10 to this article, the court may make such orders with regard to the fail- 11 ure or refusal as are just, among them: 12 1. an order that the issues to which the information is relevant shall 13 be deemed resolved for purposes of the action in accordance with the 14 claims of the party obtaining the order; or 15 2. an order prohibiting the disobedient party from supporting or 16 opposing designated claims or defenses, from producing in evidence 17 designated things or items of testimony, or from introducing any 18 evidence of the physical, mental or blood condition sought to be deter- 19 mined, or from using certain witnesses; or 20 3. an order striking out pleadings or parts thereof, or staying 21 further proceedings until the order is obeyed, or dismissing the action EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01800-01-5 S. 5774 2 1 or any part thereof, or rendering a judgment by default against the 2 disobedient party. 3 (b) If any party to a medical malpractice action, or a person who is 4 or was an officer, director, member, employee or agent of a party or 5 otherwise under the party's control, intentionally destroys, mutilates 6 or significantly alters any medical record, including any metadata, 7 audit trail or log-in information associated with any electronic 8 records, the party or person shall be subject to a civil penalty of not 9 less than one thousand dollars for each such act, as well as compensato- 10 ry and punitive damages. 11 (c) Any person who has been injured because of the intentional 12 destruction, mutilation or significant alteration of a medical record, 13 including any metadata, audit trail or log-in information associated 14 with any electronic records, shall have a private right of action 15 against the person or entity responsible therefor to recover damages 16 where such destruction, mutilation or significant alteration prevented 17 or significantly impeded the ability of the person so injured to prove 18 such person's claim. 19 (d) The provisions of this section are in addition to, but shall not 20 supersede, any other rights or remedies available in law or equity. 21 § 2. Section 3101 of the civil practice law and rules is amended by 22 adding a new subdivision (j) to read as follows: 23 (j) In addition to any other matter which may be subject to disclo- 24 sure, a healthcare provider must produce any metadata, audit trail, and 25 log-in information associated with any electronic medical records of the 26 person whose care or treatment is the subject of the action. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any 28 intentional destruction, mutilation or significant alteration of a 29 medical record occurring on or after such date.